Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [373.52] CONSTITUTIONAL INTEGRITY AND VALUES IN LAW (CIVIL) ACT. new text end new text begin (a) This section may be cited as the "Constitutional Integrity and Values in Law (CIVIL) Act." new text end new text begin (b) A county may, by resolution, designate itself to be a constitutional county. The chief clerical officer of the county must file the resolution with the secretary of state. new text end new text begin (c) A constitutional county may determine to not authorize or appropriate funds, employees, property, or other county resources for the purpose of enforcing any law, rule, or regulation that conflicts with the federal constitution or federal law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end